Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 16 Conservation Districts

Severability. —

Section 18, ch. 134, Laws 1941, reads: “If any section, sentence, clause, or phrase of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of the act. The legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this act, and each sentence, section, clause or phrase thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, sentences, clauses or phrases be declared unconstitutional.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 19, ch. 134, Laws 1941, reads: “Insofar as any of the provisions of this act conflict with the provisions of any other act, the provisions of this act shall be controlling.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture §§ 20, 25, 28-29, 32; 16A Am. Jur. 2d Constitutional Law § 324 to 327, 369, 370; 56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations §§ 10, 12 to 15.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 25 to 64.

§ 11-16-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited
as the “Wyoming Conservation Districts Law.”

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 34-1401; W.S. 1957, § 11-234; Laws 1959, ch. 193, § 1; 1971, ch. 111, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-16-102(a)(xii).

Library references. —

17 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 73.

§ 11-16-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Agency of this state” means any subdivision, agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the government of this state;

“At large member” means any registered voter and taxpayer within the county;

“Commission” or “state conservation commission” means the state board of agriculture;

“Conservation” means development, improvement, maintenance, preservation, protection and use of natural resources, and the control and prevention of floodwater and sediment damages, and the disposal of excess waters;

“District” or “conservation district” means a governmental subdivision of this state, and a public body corporate and politic, organized in accordance with this act;

“Due notice” for those provisions other than election and referendum provisions, means notice published at least twice, with an interval of six (6) days between the two (2) publication dates, in a newspaper of general circulation within the boundaries of the proposed or organized district, or by posting at five (5) conspicuous places within the organized or proposed district, such posting to include, where possible, posting at public places where it may be customary to post notices concerning county or municipal affairs generally. Except as otherwise provided in this act, the notice of any hearing required under this act shall fix the time, place and purpose, which shall be not less than ten (10) or more than fifteen (15) days after the first publication or first posting of the notice. Any hearing held pursuant to such notice may be adjourned from time to time without renewing the notice for the adjourned dates. Notice for any election or referendum required by this act shall be as specifically provided in this act, or if not specifically provided in this act, as required in the Special District Elections Act of 1994;

“Government” or “governmental” means the government of this state, the government of the United States, and any subdivision, agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of either of them;

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 21, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

“Renewable natural resources,” “natural resources” or “resources,” means land, soil, water, vegetation, trees, wild rivers, wilderness, natural beauty, scenery and open space;

“Urban” or “urban member” means any registered voter of an incorporated Wyoming municipality;

“This act” means W.S.

11-16-101

through

11-16-135

.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 34-1403; W.S. 1957, § 11-235; Laws 1959, ch. 193, § 3; 1971, ch. 111, §§ 2 to 4; 1973, ch. 147, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 21, §§ 2, 3; 1991, ch. 17, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, §§ 2, 5; 2013 ch. 150, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “11-16-135” for “11-16-134” in (a)(xii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Stated

in

Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 490 P.2d 1069,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 267

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 11-16-103.
Legislative declarations and policy.

It is hereby declared that the farm and grazing lands of Wyoming are among the basic assets of the state; that improper land use practices cause and contribute to serious erosion of these lands by wind and water; that among the consequences which would result from such conditions are the deterioration of soil and its fertility and the silting and sedimentation of stream channels, reservoirs, dams and ditches; that to conserve soil, and soil and water resources, and prevent and control soil erosion, it is necessary that land use practices contributing to soil erosion be discouraged and that appropriate soil conserving land use practices be adopted.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the legislature to provide for the conservation of the soil, and soil and water resources of this state, and for the control and prevention of soil erosion and for flood prevention or the conservation, development, utilization, and disposal of water, and thereby to stabilize ranching and farming operations, to preserve natural resources, protect the tax base, control floods, prevent impairment of dams and reservoirs, preserve wildlife, protect public lands, and protect and promote the health, safety and general welfare of the people of this state.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 34-1402; W.S. 1957, § 11-236; Laws 1959, ch. 193, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-16-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987,
ch. 15, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to creation of board of agriculture, see §

11-2-101

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 4, related to the establishment of the state conservation commission.

Termination of state conservation commission. —

Laws 1987, ch. 15, § 2, terminates the state conservation commission effective July 1, 1987, transfers respective powers and duties to the state board of agriculture and provides for the transfer of employees, revenue, appropriations and property.

§ 11-16-105.
State board of agriculture; duties generally.

The commission shall:

Keep a record of its official actions, adopt a seal, which shall be judicially noticed, and perform acts, hold public hearings and promulgate rules and regulations as necessary for the execution of its functions under this act;

Assist and guide districts in the preparation and carrying out of programs for resource conservation authorized under this act, review district programs, coordinate the programs of the several districts and resolve any conflicts, and facilitate, promote, assist, harmonize, coordinate and guide the resource conservation programs and activities of districts as they relate to other special purpose districts, counties and other public agencies;

Keep the supervisors of the districts organized under this act informed of the activities and experiences of other districts and facilitate cooperation and an interchange of advice and experience between the districts;

Coordinate the programs of the several conservation districts so far as this may be done by advice and consultation;

Recommend the appropriation of state funds necessary to finance the activities of the commission and the conservation districts; distribute to conservation districts funds, equipment, supplies and services received by the commission for that purpose from any source, subject to conditions made applicable thereto by any state or federal statute or local ordinance making available the funds, property or services; issue regulations establishing guidelines and suitable controls to govern the use by conservation districts of such funds, property and services; and review all budgets, administrative procedures and operations of the districts and advise the districts concerning their conformance with applicable laws and regulations;

Disseminate information throughout the state concerning the activities and programs of the conservation districts and encourage the formation of such districts in areas where their organization is desirable; enlist the cooperation and collaboration of state, federal, regional, interstate and local public and private agencies with the conservation districts; facilitate arrangements under which the conservation districts may serve county governing bodies and other agencies as their local operating agencies in the administration of any activity concerned with the conservation of renewable natural resources; and except as otherwise assigned by law, carry out the policies of this state in programs at the state level for the conservation of the renewable natural resources of this state and represent the state in matters affecting such resources.

Whenever the commission determines that there exists a substantial conflict between the resources conservation program of a district and the proposed plans or activities directly affecting resource conservation prepared by any other local governmental unit or agency of this state, and the conflict cannot be resolved through consultation procedures, the commission shall submit a report to the governor.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 34-1405; Laws 1947, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-238; Laws 1959, ch. 193, § 5; 1971, ch. 111, §§ 6 to 11; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-16-102(a)(xii).

§ 11-16-106.
Department of agriculture; when contracts invalid.

No contract of the state
commission for the payment of money is valid unless the commission
has available at the time the contract is made funds sufficient for
the payment thereof.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 34-1405; Laws 1947, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-238; Laws 1959, ch. 193, § 5; 1971, ch. 111, §§ 6 to 11; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1994, ch. 29, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

§ 11-16-107.
Report to director; reports by district supervisors to board.

On or before November 1 each even-numbered year, the commission shall report to the director of the department of agriculture the number and acreages of districts in existence or in process of organization, together with an estimate of the number and probable acreages of the districts which may be organized during the ensuing period; the balance of funds, if any, available to the commission and to the districts; and the estimates of the commission as to the sums needed for its administrative and other expenses and for allocation among the several districts during the ensuing period.

The supervisors of the respective districts shall submit to the commission such statements, estimates, budgets and other information as the commission may require. The director shall include the information furnished by the commission in his report to the governor.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 17; C.S. 1945, § 34-1417; W.S. 1957, § 11-239; Laws 1959, ch. 193, § 13; 1971, ch. 111, § 12; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

As to report to governor, see §

9-2-1014

.

§ 11-16-108.
Petition to form district; contents; consolidation and exclusion.

Any ten (10) owners of land lying within the limits of the proposed district may file a petition with the commission asking that a conservation district be organized to function in the territory described in the petition. The petition shall meet all of the requirements of W.S. 22-29-105(f). The commission shall act upon the petition for formation in the same manner as set forth in W.S.

22-29-109

for county commissioners in determining if a petition for district formation shall be voted upon. When more than one (1) petition is filed covering parts of the same territory, the commission may consolidate all or any such petitions, or may exclude from any petition areas in conflict with another petition or petitions.

through (v) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 6; 1945, ch. 6, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 34-1406; W.S. 1957, § 11-240; Laws 1959, ch. 193, § 6; 1971, ch. 111, §§ 13 to 15; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, §§ 2, 5.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-16-109.
Notice and hearing on petition; approval or denial; criteria.

After the hearing, if
the commission determines, upon the facts presented at the hearing
and other relevant facts that are available, that there is need in
the interest of the public health, safety and welfare for a conservation
district to function in the territory considered at the hearing, it
shall record such determination and define by metes and bounds or
by legal subdivisions the boundaries of the district. In making the
determination and defining the boundaries, the commission shall give
weight and consideration to the topography of the area considered
and of the state, the composition of soils therein, the distribution
of erosion, the carrying capacity and condition of grazing lands,
the numbers of livestock grazed, the prevailing land use and management
practices, the desirability and necessity of including within the
district the particular lands under consideration and the benefits
such land may receive from being included within the district, the
relation of the proposed district to existing watersheds and agricultural
regions and to other conservation districts already organized or proposed
for organization, and such other physical, geographical and economic
factors as are relevant, having due regard to the legislative policy
set forth in W.S.

11-16-103

. The territory included within the district need not
be contiguous. If the commission determines there is no need for a
conservation district to function in the territory considered at the
hearing, it shall record such determination and deny the petition.
Any owner of lands within a proposed district which is less than a
countywide district may have his owned and leased lands excluded from
the proposed district upon presentation of a petition and description
of the lands to the commission not less than seven (7) days prior
to the holding of the referendum for the organization of the district.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 6; 1945, ch. 6, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 34-1406; W.S. 1957, § 11-240; Laws 1959, ch. 193, § 6; 1971, ch. 111, §§ 13 to 15; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 21, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

§ 11-16-110.
Canvass of ballots.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 21, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 21, § 3.

Immediately after the polls close, the referendum officers shall canvass the ballots. The results disclosed by the canvass shall be certified by the commission.

If a majority of the qualified electors voting in the referendum favor the formation of the district, the proposal to organize the proposed district shall carry and the commission shall proceed to make the determination required in W.S.

11-16-112

. If the majority of the qualified electors voting in the referendum are against the organization of the district, the proposal to form the district shall fail and the commission shall deny the petition. The commission shall promptly make public the result of the referendum.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 6; 1945, ch. 6, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 34-1406; W.S. 1957, § 11-240; Laws 1959, ch. 193, § 6; 1971, ch. 111, §§ 13 to 15; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 21, §§ 2, 3; 1998, ch. 115, §§ 2, 5.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

§ 11-16-111.
Board of agriculture to provide for issuance of notices, conduct
of hearings and referenda.

The commission shall
provide for the issuance of notices and the conduct of hearings and
referenda by appropriate regulations. It shall provide for registration
prior to the date of the referendum of all eligible voters, or prescribe
some other appropriate procedure for the determination of those eligible
as voters in the referendum.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 6; 1945, ch. 6, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 34-1406; W.S. 1957, § 11-240; 1971, ch. 111, §§ 13 to 15; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

§ 11-16-112.
Result of referendum; announcement; practicability of district; determination;
criteria.

After making public the
result of the referendum, the commission shall consider and determine
whether the operation of the district within the defined boundaries
is administratively practicable. If the commission determines the
operation of the district is not administratively practicable, it
shall record the determination and deny the petition. If the commission
determines that the operation of the district is administratively
practicable, it shall record the determination and proceed with the
organization of the district. In making the determination the commission
shall give regard to the attitudes of the voters lying within the
defined boundaries, the number of voters eligible to vote in the referendum
who voted, the proportion of votes cast in favor of the creation of
the district to the total number of votes cast, the approximate wealth
and income of the owners of land of the proposed district, the probable
expense of carrying on erosion-control operations within the district,
and other economic and social factors as are relevant.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 6; 1945, ch. 6, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 34-1406; W.S. 1957, § 11-240; Laws 1971, ch. 111, §§ 13 to 15; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 21, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

§ 11-16-113.
Establishment of district.

If the commission determines the operation of the proposed district is administratively practicable, it shall appoint two (2) supervisors who are owners of land in the district to act with three (3) supervisors elected as provided hereinafter as the governing body of the district. The district shall be a governmental subdivision of this state and a public body corporate and politic. The two (2) appointed supervisors shall present to the secretary of state an application signed by them setting forth by recital only and not in detail:

That a petition for the creation of the district was filed with the commission pursuant to the provisions of this act, and the proceedings specified in the act were taken pursuant to the petition;

That the application is filed to complete the organization of the district as a governmental subdivision and a public body, corporate and politic, under this act;

That the commission has appointed them as supervisors;

The name and official residence of each supervisor and a certified copy of the appointment evidencing his right to office;

The term of office of each supervisor;

The name of the district; and

The location of the principal office of the supervisors of the district.

The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by each supervisor before an officer authorized to administer oaths, who shall certify upon the application that he personally knows the supervisors and knows them to be the officers affirmed in the application, and that each has subscribed thereto in the officer’s presence. The application shall be accompanied by a certified statement by the commission, setting forth the boundaries of the district but otherwise containing no detail other than the mere recitals that:

A petition was filed, notice issued and hearing held as required by law;

The commission determined that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, for a conservation district to function in the proposed territory and did define the boundaries;

Notice was given and a referendum held on the question of the creation of such district;

The result of the referendum showed a majority of the votes cast in favor of the creation of the district; and

The commission did determine the operation of the proposed district is administratively practicable.

The secretary of state shall examine the application and statement and if he finds the name proposed for the district is not so similar to that of another conservation district as to cause confusion or uncertainty, he shall record them in an appropriate book in his office. If the secretary of state finds the name proposed for the district is so similar to that of any other conservation district of this state as to lead to confusion, he shall certify that fact to the commission, which shall submit a new name for the district which is not subject to such defects. Upon receipt of the new name the secretary of state shall record the application and statement, with the name so modified, in an appropriate book. When the application and statement have been made, filed and recorded, the district is a governmental subdivision of this state and a public body corporate and politic. The secretary of state shall issue to the supervisors a certificate, under the seal of the state, of the organization of the district, and shall record the certificate with the application and statement. The boundaries of the district shall include the territory determined by the commission, but shall not include any area included within the boundaries of another conservation district organized under this act.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 6; 1945, ch. 6, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 34-1406; W.S. 1957, § 11-240; Laws 1959, ch. 193, § 6; 1971, ch. 111, §§ 13 to 15; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-16-102(a)(xii).

§ 11-16-114.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998,
ch. 115, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 139, § 6, related to filing subsequent petitions six months after the date of denial of a petition.

§ 11-16-115.
Districts; transfer of land; division or consolidation; change in
name.

Upon written request of the board of supervisors of the conservation district or districts involved, with a showing that the request is approved by a majority vote of the members of each board involved the commission may, by administrative order:

Transfer lands from one district to another;

Divide a single district into two (2) or more districts, each of which shall thereafter operate as a separate district; or

Consolidate two (2) or more districts to operate thereafter as a single district.

The secretary of state shall make and issue a corrected certificate of organization upon receipt of such certification from the commission.

Petitions for a change in the name of a conservation district may be submitted to the commission by the board of supervisors of a conservation district. If the commission approves the change of name, it shall certify the change to the secretary of state and shall notify the board of supervisors of the conservation district of the change, setting out in the notice the new name of the district. The secretary of state shall make and issue a corrected certificate of organization upon receipt of such certification from the commission.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 6; 1945, ch. 6, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 34-1406; W.S. 1957, § 11-240; Laws 1959, ch. 193, § 6; 1971, ch. 111, §§ 13 to 15; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

§ 11-16-116.
Districts; proof of organization.

In any suit, action or
proceeding relating to any action of the district, the district is
deemed to have been established in accordance with this act upon proof
of the issuance of the certificate by the secretary of state. A copy
of the certificate certified by the secretary of state is admissible
in evidence in any suit, action or proceeding and is proof of the
filing and contents thereof.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 6; 1945, ch. 6, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 34-1406; W.S. 1957, § 11-240; Laws 1971, ch. 111, §§ 13 to 15; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-16-102(a)(xii).

§ 11-16-117.
Districts; termination; dissolution procedures; determination by
board of agriculture; legal effects of dissolution.

After five (5) years after the organization of a district under this act, any ten (10) owners of land lying within the district may petition the commission that the operations of the district be discontinued and the existence of the district terminated. The commission may conduct public meetings and hearings upon the petition as necessary in the consideration thereof. Within sixty (60) days after a petition has been filed with the commission, it shall give notice of a referendum as provided in the Special District Elections Act of 1994. The commission shall supervise the referendum and issue appropriate regulations governing the conduct thereof. The question shall be submitted by ballots upon which the words “For terminating the existence of the . . . . . (name of the conservation district to be here inserted)” and “Against terminating the existence of the . . . . . (name of the conservation district to be here inserted)” shall appear, with a square before each proposition and a direction to insert an X mark in the square before one (1) or the other as the voter may favor or oppose dissolution of the district. Qualified electors of the district are eligible to vote in the referendum. No informalities in the conduct of the referendum or related matters shall invalidate the referendum or result if notice is given substantially as herein provided and the referendum is fairly conducted.

The commission shall publish the result of the referendum. If a majority of the votes cast in the referendum oppose dissolution of the district, the commission shall determine whether the continued operation of the district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable. If the commission determines the continued operation of the district is administratively practicable, it shall record its determination and deny the petition. If a majority of the votes cast favor dissolution of the district it shall certify that fact to the supervisors of the district. In making the determination of administrative practicality to continue the district the commission shall consider those factors set forth in W.S.

11-16-112

for creation of the district.

Upon receipt from the commission of a certification that the majority of votes cast in the referendum favor dissolution of the district, the supervisors shall forthwith terminate the affairs of the district. The supervisors shall dispose of all property belonging to the district at public auction and pay the net proceeds of the sales to the state treasurer. The supervisors shall thereupon file a verified application with the secretary of state for dissolution of the district, and shall transmit with the application the certificate of the commission that the majority of votes cast at the referendum favored dissolution of the district. The application shall recite that the property of the district has been disposed of and the proceeds paid over as provided by law, setting forth a full accounting of the properties and proceeds of sale. The secretary of state shall issue to the supervisors a certificate of dissolution and shall record the certificate in an appropriate book in his office. The secretary of state shall make no charge for any service required of him by this act.

Upon issuance of a certificate of dissolution all ordinances and regulations adopted and in force within the district are void. All contracts to which the district or supervisors are parties remain in force and effect for the period provided in such contracts. The commission shall be substituted for the district or supervisors as party to the contracts. The commission is entitled to all benefits and subject to all liabilities under such contracts and has the same right and liability to perform, require performance, sue and be sued thereon, and to modify or terminate the contracts as the supervisors of the district would have had. Dissolution does not affect the lien of any judgment entered or the pendency of any action instituted under W.S. 11-16-126 [repealed], and the commission succeeds to all rights and obligations of the district or supervisors as to such liens and actions.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 16; C.S. 1945, § 34-1416; W.S. 1957, § 11-241; Laws 1959, ch. 193, § 12; 1971, ch. 111, § 16; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 21, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

Editor's notes. —

Section 11-16-126, referred to in the last sentence in subsection (d), was repealed in 1987.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the last sentence in subsection (c), see § 11-16-102(a)(xii).

§ 11-16-118.
District
supervisors; term; vacancies; expenses; removal; quorum; bond required
of employees; areas included in district; cooperative agreement with
city.

The term of the two (2) supervisors appointed extends from their appointment until the second annual election held in the district. A supervisor shall hold office from his election or appointment and taking of the oath of office until his successor has been elected or appointed, and qualified. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term. Vacancies in the office of any supervisor shall be filled by appointment by the commission upon the recommendations of the district supervisors, the appointee to serve until the next election at which time the vacancy shall be filled by the electors for the unexpired term. A supervisor shall receive no compensation for his services, but is entitled to expenses, including traveling expenses, necessarily incurred in the discharge of his duties. Any supervisor may be removed by the commission upon notice and hearing, for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office.

A majority of the supervisors constitutes a quorum and the concurrence of three (3) supervisors is required for determination of any matter.

The supervisors shall require a bond to be issued for all employees and officers entrusted with funds or property. The supervisors shall provide for keeping a full and accurate record of all proceedings, resolutions, regulations and orders issued or adopted. The accounts, receipts and disbursements of the district shall be subject to the audit and reporting requirements set forth in W.S. 9-1-507(a)(iii).

All cities, towns, villages or other urban and suburban areas lying wholly or partly within the exterior boundaries of a conservation district shall, from the effective date of this act, be included in the district. In doubtful cases, the commission shall determine the district which includes any urban or suburban area.

By cooperative agreement with the city concerned, a district may perform within the boundaries of the city any work required or authorized under this act, through such administrative and financial arrangements as the city and the district agree upon.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 34-1408; W.S. 1957, § 11-242; Laws 1959, ch. 193, § 8; 1971, ch. 111, § 17; 1973, ch. 147, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-109

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1994, ch. 29, § 1; 2004, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (c), substituted “the audit and reporting requirements set forth in W.S. 9-1-507(a)(iii)” for “an annual review. If a district's annual budget averages twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) or more over a period of four (4) consecutive years, the district shall commission an independent audit at the conclusion of the fourth year. Copies of the annual review or audit will be sent to the department of agriculture.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-16-102(a)(xii).

§ 11-16-119.
District supervisors; nomination; qualifications; election; term.

Within thirty (30) days
after issuance by the secretary of state of a certificate of organization
of a conservation district, applications for election under the Special
District Elections Act of 1994 may be filed with the commission by
candidates for supervisors, who shall be owners of land within the
district. The commission may extend for not to exceed thirty (30)
days the time within which applications may be filed. The commission
shall give notice of an election to be held for the election of three
(3) supervisors for the district. All qualified electors within the
district are eligible to vote. The three (3) supervisors first elected
shall draw lots, one (1) for a term of two (2) years, and two (2)
for a term of three (3) years. Thereafter supervisors shall be elected
each year to serve for a full term of three (3) years. The number
of supervisors elected each year shall be determined by the number
of supervisors whose terms expire at that time. The commission shall
provide for all elections, supervise the conduct thereof, and prescribe
regulations governing the conduct of all elections, and shall make
public the result thereof.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 34-1407; W.S. 1957, § 11-243; Laws 1959, ch. 193, § 7; 1967, ch. 46, § 1; 1971, ch. 111, § 18; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-110

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 21, § 2; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

Effect of election of supervisors by owners and occupiers.
—

Chapter 215, Laws 1961, authorizing the establishment of improvement districts, was enacted by a legislature in which all of the state's electors have the unquestioned right to be fairly represented. Under the act, districts may be formed only as subdivisions of conservation districts. And a precondition to their formation referendum is a determination by a board of supervisors of the affected conservation district, popularly elected by both occupiers and owners of land within the district, that the watershed improvement district is both necessary and administratively practicable. Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 410 U.S. 743, 93 S. Ct. 1237, 35 L. Ed. 2d 675, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 16 (1973).

§ 11-16-120.
District supervisors; elections under Election Code and for new districts.

District supervisors shall be elected in subsequent elections under the Special District Elections Act of 1994 and as hereinafter provided for new districts:

At the first subsequent director election following establishment of a new district, five (5) supervisors, who reside within the district shall be elected at large by a nonpartisan ballot. Three (3) supervisors shall be rural residents, one (1) shall be a resident of an urban area and one (1) shall be elected at large. At the first subsequent director election, the at large candidate receiving the largest number of votes shall be elected for a four (4) year term, the urban candidate receiving the largest number of votes shall be elected for a four (4) year term, the rural candidate receiving the largest number of votes shall serve a four (4) year term and the two (2) candidates receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected for two (2) year terms. In succeeding elections all supervisors shall be elected for four (4) year terms.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 147, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-243.1; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-111

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1987, ch. 21, § 2; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, §§ 2, 5.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and the notes thereunder.

As to nomination by petition, see §

22-5-301

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-16-121.
District supervisor; cooperation and agreements between districts;
agreements with districts in adjoining states.

The supervisors of two (2) or more districts organized under this act may cooperate in the exercise of any or all powers conferred in this act.

Any two (2) or more districts may engage in joint activities by agreement for planning, financing, constructing, operating, maintaining and administering any program or project concerned with the conservation of renewable natural resources. The districts concerned may make available for purposes of the agreement any funds, property, personnel, equipment or services available to them under this act.

Any district may enter into such agreements with districts in an adjoining state if the law in the other state permits such agreements.

The commission may propose, guide and facilitate the establishment and carrying out of such agreements.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 14; C.S. 1945, § 34-1414; W.S. 1957, § 11-244; Laws 1971, ch. 111, § 19; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-112

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-16-102(a)(xii).